Florida, session 2026, SB1554.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (6) of section 13 499.0295, Florida Statutes, as amended by SB ____, 2026 Regular 14 Session, is amended to read: 15 499.0295âExperimental treatments for terminal conditions 16 and life-threatening rare diseases.â 17 (6) 18 (c)âThe department shall annually publish a public report 19 of experimental treatment outcomes and safety signals in the 20 aggregate. The health information and proprietary pricing 21 information contained in the report is confidential and exempt 22 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 23 Constitution. 24 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 25 necessity that the health information and proprietary pricing 26 information contained in the annual public report of 27 experimental treatment outcomes and safety signals under s. 28 499.0295, Florida Statutes, be made confidential and exempt from 29 s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the 30 State Constitution. The Legislature finds that the release of 31 such information could harm patients with terminal conditions or 32 life-threatening rare diseases by exposing extremely sensitive 33 personal health data. The Legislature further finds that 34 patients who pursue experimental treatments under the Promising 35 Pathways Act have a strong expectation of privacy regarding 36 their medical information and that the potential harm resulting 37 from disclosure of such information outweighs any public benefit 38 that may be derived from its release. 39 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 40 SB ____ or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 41 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 42 thereof and becomes a law.